Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 3. Compact Concerning Annuity, Life, Disability, and Long-term Care Insurance.
Sec. 21.42.705.
Opt-out duties, guidelines, remedies.

As a participant in the Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Compact, it is the policy of the state to opt out, and the director shall opt out, of any Uniform Standard that provides a materially lower level of protection for or materially diminishes the rights of Alaska policyholders or policy applicants under Alaska law.

If the director or a court of competent jurisdiction finds that the policy set out in (a) of this section has been violated, notice of the violation shall be given to the legislature, and reasonable and prompt measures shall be taken to opt out of the Uniform Standard that does not comply with the policy statement set out in (a) of this section to the extent that such action is permissible under the Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Compact.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 2006)